Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 3. Areas of Extreme Fire Danger

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d Fires § 1.

§ 35-9-301.
Closing area upon recommendation of county fire warden.

When, upon recommendation of the county fire warden, a board of county commissioners deems the fire danger in a given area of the county to be extreme, because of drought, the presence of an excessive amount of inflammable material or for any other sufficient reason, the board of county commissioners may close the area to any form of use by the public or may limit such use upon recommendation of the county fire warden. This closing shall include prohibition of any type of open fire for such period of time as the board of county commissioners may deem necessary and proper. The county fire warden shall notify the Wyoming state forester of any type of fire closure or the lifting of any type of fire closure under this section.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 30, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-448.1; Laws 1993, ch. 133, § 1.

Counties may not regulate fireworks. —

Sections

35-10-203

,

18-3-509

,

35-9-401

through

35-9-402

, and

35-9-301

through

35-9-304

provide no grants of authority, express or implied, allowing counties to regulate fireworks. Dunnegan v. Laramie County Comm'rs, 852 P.2d 1138,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 35-9-302.
Access of residents to home or property; contents of order of proclamation.

Provided however, that nothing in W.S.

35-9-301

through

35-9-304

and no order of a board of county commissioners shall prohibit any person residing within the area from full and free access to his home or property, nor prevent any legitimate use thereof by the owner or authorized personnel on ordinary day to day business or lessee of such property. The order of proclamation closing or limiting the use of said area shall set forth the exact area coming under the order, the date on which the order shall become effective, and if deemed advisable, the authority from which permits for entry into said area may be obtained.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 30, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 35-448.2; Laws 1993, ch. 133, § 1.

§ 35-9-303.
Rules.

The board of land commissioners shall promulgate rules as are necessary to require county fire wardens and boards of county commissioners to carry out the purposes of W.S.

35-9-301

through

35-9-304

, and provide for proper notice to the public.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 30, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 35-448.3; Laws 1993, ch. 133, § 1.

§ 35-9-304.
Illegal entry or use.

Any entry into or use of any area in violation of this act [§§

35-9-301

through

35-9-304

] shall be a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) or imprisonment in the county jail for not to exceed thirty (30) days or both the fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 30, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 35-448.4.